Hawaii statutes.
§291-29 Lights for other vehicles.
All vehicles other than those specified in section 291-25 shall during the time
mentioned in such section when upon the public highway, carry a lighted light
on the extreme width of each side so arranged that a light from the lamps shall
be visible in every direction at least two hundred feet. [RL 1945, pt of
§11707; RL 1955, §311-11; HRS §291-29; am L 1979, c 105, §29]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next